Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-412
Districts; bordering on river constituting state boundary line; boundary.

The boundary line or part thereof of all school districts which border on any river that is the boundary line between the State of Nebraska and any other state shall be identical with the boundary line of the state.

Laws 1923, c. 62, § 1, p. 189;

C.S.1929, § 79-131;

R.S.1943, § 79-143;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 60, p. 713;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-421;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 161.